Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-109
Elective office, defined.

Elective office shall mean any office which has candidates nominated or elected at the time of a statewide primary election, any office which has candidates nominated at the time of a statewide primary election and elected at the time of a statewide general election, any office which has candidates elected at the time of a statewide general election, any office which has candidates nominated or elected at a city or village election, and any office created by an act of the Legislature which has candidates elected at an election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 9.